Utah statutes.
61-2b-11.   Curriculum to be determined by board.
In making its determinations with respect to the courses of study required by
Section 61-2b-10, the board shall give weight to courses which teach one or
more of the following:
(1)  knowledge of technical terms commonly used in or related to real estate
appraising, appraisal report writing, and economic concepts applicable to real
estate;
(2)  an understanding of the basic principles of land economics, the basic
principles of the real estate appraisal process, and the problems likely to be
encountered in gathering, interpreting, and processing the data required in
the real estate appraisal process;
(3)  an understanding of the standards for the development and communication
of real estate appraisals as provided in this chapter;
(4)  an understanding of the ethical rules that a real estate appraiser is
required to observe;
(5)  knowledge of theories of depreciation, cost estimating, methods of
capitalization, and the mathematics of real estate appraisal;
(6)  an understanding of basic real estate law; and
(7)  an understanding of the types of misconduct for which disciplinary
proceedings may be initiated against a person licensed under this chapter.
